Washington statutes.
RCW 43.163.090

Economic development finance objectives plan.

The authority shall adopt a general plan of economic development finance objectives to be implemented by the authority during the period of the plan. The authority may exercise the powers authorized under this chapter prior to the adoption of the initial plan. In developing the plan, the authority shall consider and set objectives for:

(1) Employment generation associated with the authority's programs;

(2) The application of funds to sectors and regions of the state economy evidencing need for improved access to capital markets and funding resources;

(3) Geographic distribution of funds and programs available through the authority;

(4) Eligibility criteria for participants in authority programs;

(5) The use of funds and resources available from or through federal, state, local, and private sources and programs;

(6) Standards for economic viability and growth opportunities of participants in authority programs;

(7) New programs which serve a targeted need for financing assistance within the purposes of this chapter; and

(8) Opportunities to improve capital access as evidenced by programs existent in other states or as they are made possible by results of private capital market circumstances.

The authority shall, as part of the finance plan required under this section, develop an outreach and marketing plan designed to increase its financial services to rural counties. As used in this section, "rural counties" means counties smaller than two hundred twenty-five square miles or as defined in RCW 43.168.020.

At least one public hearing shall be conducted by the authority on the plan prior to its adoption. The plan shall be adopted by resolution of the authority no later than November 15, 1990. The authority may periodically update the plan as determined necessary by the authority. The plan or updated plan shall include a report on authority activities conducted since the commencement of authority operation or since the last plan was reported, whichever is more recent, including a statement of results achieved under the purposes of this chapter and the plan. Upon adoption, the authority shall conduct its programs in observance of the objectives established in the plan.

[ 2001 c 304 s 1; 1998 c 245 s 50; 1997 c 257 s 1; 1989 c 279 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2001 c 304: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 14, 2001]." [ 2001 c 304 s 4.]